Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6302.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1347. (1) For each public school building it operates, the board of a school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall purchase or possess a United States flag of a size of not less than 4 feet 2 inches by 8 feet, flag staff, and the necessary appliances for displaying the flag upon on the flag staff; shall erect the flag staff on the public school building or on a conspicuous place upon on the school grounds; and shall display the flag upon on the flag staff at all times during school hours, inclement weather excepted, in which case the flag shall must be prominently displayed within the school building. (2) In addition to the display of the flag at the school required under subsection (1), the board or board of directors shall ensure that a United States flag of a size not less than 2 feet by 3 feet is displayed, hoisted, draped, or placed in a stand or post in a prominent location in each classroom or other instructional site in which pupils recite the pledge of allegiance to the flag of the United States.